Vermont statutes. Title 23 Motor Vehicles
Subchapter 3. Suspension and Revocation

§ 671.
Procedure.

In his or her discretion, the Commissioner may suspend indefinitely or for a definite time the license of an operator, or the right of an unlicensed individual to operate a motor vehicle, after opportunity for a hearing upon not less than 15 days’ notice, if the Commissioner has reason to believe that the holder thereof is an individual who is incompetent to operate a motor vehicle or is operating improperly so as to endanger the public. If, upon receipt of such notice, the individual requests a hearing, such suspension shall not take effect unless the Commissioner, after hearing, determines that the suspension is justified. If the Commissioner imposes a suspension, he or she may order the license delivered to him or her. Not less than six months from the date of suspension and each six months thereafter, an individual upon whom such suspension has been imposed may apply for reinstatement of his or her license or right to operate or for a new license. Upon receipt of such application, the Commissioner shall thereupon cause an investigation to be made and, if so requested, conduct a hearing to determine whether such suspension should be continued in effect.

In his or her discretion, the Commissioner may suspend for a period not exceeding 15 days the license of an operator, or the right of an unlicensed individual to operate a motor vehicle, without hearing, whenever he or she finds upon full reports submitted by an enforcement officer or motor vehicle inspector that the safety of the public has been or will be imperiled as a result of the operation of a motor vehicle by such operator or unlicensed individual.

The Commissioner may suspend the license of an operator, or the right of an unlicensed individual to operate a motor vehicle, while a prosecution for an offense under this title is pending against such individual if:

the Commissioner finds upon full reports submitted to him or her by an enforcement officer or motor vehicle inspector that the safety of the public will be imperiled by permitting such operator or such unlicensed individual to operate a motor vehicle; or

the Commissioner finds that such operator is seeking to delay the prosecution.

The Commissioner shall not suspend the license of an operator, or the right of an unlicensed individual to operate a motor vehicle, for any cause that has constituted the subject matter of a prosecution in which the conviction of such individual has not been obtained.

The Commissioner shall revoke licenses obtained fraudulently. The Commissioner shall also revoke licenses when required by law, and such revocation shall not entitle the holder of such license to hearing.

If a hearing is required under the provisions of this section, it shall be held in accordance with the provisions of sections 105-107 of this title and at such time and place as the Commissioner may determine. It shall be in the discretion of the Commissioner to determine the granting of a hearing and subsequent hearing in response to a petition for a hearing in connection with suspension orders issued under the provisions of subsections (b) and (c) of this section.

Notwithstanding subsection (d) of this section, if the Commissioner receives official notice, in any form he or she deems appropriate, that an individual’s right to operate a motor vehicle has been suspended or revoked in another jurisdiction, the Commissioner may suspend the individual’s license or right to operate a motor vehicle in this State after the opportunity for a hearing upon not less than 15 days’ notice. If the individual’s license or right to operate is subsequently reinstated by the other jurisdiction, the individual may apply to the Commissioner for reinstatement of his or her license or right to operate a motor vehicle in this State.

HISTORY:

Amended

1977, No. 238

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. July 1, 1979;

1979, No. 79

, § 1, eff. May 10, 1979;

1995, No. 112

(Adj. Sess.), § 10;

2013, No. 96

(Adj. Sess.), § 144;

2015, No. 47

, § 18;

2019, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 156;

2019, No. 149

(Adj. Sess.), § 9.

§ 671a.
Repealed. 1993, No. 212 (Adj. Sess.), § 12.

§ 672.
Suspending or revoking right of nonresident operator.

The Commissioner may suspend or revoke the right of any nonresident operator to operate a motor vehicle in this State for the same causes and under the same conditions and in the same manner that he or she could suspend or revoke the license of any resident operator. Thereupon the right of such nonresident operator to operate any motor vehicle in this State shall terminate, and he or she shall be subject to the same penalties as a resident operator who operates after the suspension or revocation of his or her license.

Whenever a nonresident operator has his or her right to operate a motor vehicle in this State suspended or revoked, the Commissioner shall mail a copy of the notice of suspension or revocation as well as a copy of the court document resulting in the suspension or revocation to the state or province of residence or licensing.

HISTORY:

Amended

1985, No. 85

, § 5.

§ 673.
Repealed.
1967, No. 147, § 53(b), eff. Oct. 1, 1968.

§ 673a.
Habitual offenders.

The Commissioner shall revoke the license of an operator or the right of an unlicensed individual to operate a motor vehicle for a period of two years when the individual is a habitual violator of the motor vehicle laws.

As used in this section, “habitual violator” means any person who has been convicted in any court in this State of eight or more moving violations each of which would result in point assessments of six or more points, including violations of section 1201 of this title, arising out of different incidents within a consecutive period of five years.

The individual may within 15 days after the notice of revocation request a hearing solely for the purpose of verifying the conviction record, and the revocation shall not take effect until the hearing has been held in accordance with the provisions of sections 105-107 of this title and the record has been verified.

HISTORY:

Added

1969, No. 231

(Adj. Sess.); amended

1977, No. 238

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. July 1, 1979;

1981, No. 229

(Adj. Sess.), § 4;

2003, No. 109

(Adj. Sess.), § 4;

2019, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 157.

§ 674.
Operating after suspension or revocation of license; penalty; removal of registration plates; towing.

Except as provided in section 676 of this title, a person whose license or privilege to operate a motor vehicle has been suspended or revoked for a violation of this section or subsection 1091(b), 1094(b), or 1128(b) or (c) of this title and who operates or attempts to operate a motor vehicle upon a public highway before the suspension period imposed for the violation has expired shall be imprisoned not more than two years or fined not more than $5,000.00, or both.
(a) (1) Except as provided in section 676 of this title, a person whose license or privilege to operate a motor vehicle has been suspended or revoked for a violation of this section or subsection 1091(b), 1094(b), or 1128(b) or (c) of this title and who operates or attempts to operate a motor vehicle upon a public highway before the suspension period imposed for the violation has expired shall be imprisoned not more than two years or fined not more than $5,000.00, or both.

A person who violates section 676 of this title for the third or subsequent time shall, if the two prior offenses occurred within two years of the third offense and on or after December 1, 2016, be imprisoned not more than two years or fined not more than $5,000.00, or both.

Violations of section 676 of this title that occurred prior to the date a person successfully completes the DLS Diversion Program shall not be counted as prior offenses under subdivision (2) of this subsection.

Except as authorized in section 1213 of this title, a person whose license or privilege to operate a motor vehicle has been suspended or revoked for a violation of section 1201 of this title or has been suspended under section 1205 of this title and who operates or attempts to operate a motor vehicle upon a public highway before reinstatement of the license shall be imprisoned not more than two years or fined not more than $5,000.00, or both. The sentence shall be subject to the following mandatory minimum terms:

For the first offense, the defendant shall pay a mandatory minimum fine of $300.00 or complete 40 hours of community service. In the event that no term of imprisonment, suspended or to serve, is imposed, the community service shall be performed within 120 days. Failure to submit proof of completion of the 40 hours within 120 days shall constitute civil contempt unless the defendant requests an extension for good cause shown prior to expiration of the 120 days.

For a second offense occurring within five years, the defendant shall pay a mandatory minimum fine of $750.00 or complete 80 hours of community service. In the event that no term of imprisonment, suspended or to serve, is imposed, the community service shall be performed within 120 days. Failure to submit proof of completion of the 80 hours within 120 days shall constitute civil contempt unless the defendant requests an extension for good cause shown prior to expiration of the 120 days.

For the third offense occurring within five years, the defendant shall serve at least 12 days of preapproved furlough with community restitution.

For the fourth offense occurring within five years, the defendant shall serve at least 18 days of preapproved furlough with community restitution.

For the fifth and subsequent offenses occurring within five years, the defendant shall be imprisoned at least 16 consecutive days in a correctional facility. The sentence may not be suspended or deferred.

An enforcement officer shall have the authority to remove any number plates from a motor vehicle that is being operated by a person in violation of subsection (a) or (b) of this section. The Commissioner shall be notified in writing and may, in his or her sole discretion, cause the plates to be returned to the registered owner or lessee for good cause shown.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this title, when a conviction for a violation of this section and a conviction for a violation of section 1201 of this title result from the same incident, any penalty or suspension or revocation of a person’s license or privilege to operate shall be imposed to be consecutive and not concurrent.

In determining appropriate fines under this section, the court may take into account the income of the defendant.

For purposes of this section and section 676 of this title, the suspension period for a violation of section 1201 or 1205 of this title shall not be deemed to expire until the person has complied with section 1209a of this title and the person’s license has been reinstated.

In establishing a prima facie case against a person accused of violating this section, the court shall accept as evidence a printout attested to by the law enforcement officer as the person’s motor vehicle record showing convictions and resulting license suspensions. The admitted motor vehicle record shall establish a permissive inference that the person was under suspension on the dates and time periods set forth in the record. No certified copy shall be required from the Department of Motor Vehicles to establish the permissive inference.

At the time of sentencing after a second or subsequent conviction under subsection (b) of this section, the court may, in addition to any penalty imposed by law, order that the motor vehicle operated by the person at the time of the offense be immobilized. At the time of sentencing after a third or subsequent conviction under subsection (b) of this section, the court may, in addition to any penalty imposed by law, order that the motor vehicle operated by the person at the time of the offense be forfeited and sold. Immobilization and forfeiture procedures under this section shall be conducted in accordance with the procedures in section 1213c of this title.

A person convicted of violating this section shall be assessed a surcharge of $50.00, which shall be added to any fine or surcharge imposed by the court. The court shall collect and transfer the surcharge assessed under this subsection to be credited to the DUI Enforcement Fund. The collection procedures described in

13 V.S.A. § 5240

shall be utilized in the collection of this surcharge.

HISTORY:

Amended

1959, No. 205

, §§ 1, 2, eff. May 29, 1959;

1975, No. 25

;

1981, No. 103

, § 1;

1981, No. 229

(Adj. Sess.), § 3;

1989, No. 179

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. May 14, 1989;

1991, No. 55

, § 11;

1995, No. 21

, § 1;

1997, No. 117

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 8, 22;

2003, No. 54

, § 12;

2005, No. 167

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. May 20, 2006;

2009, No. 126

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. July 1, 2011;

2011, No. 147

(Adj. Sess.), § 3;

2013, No. 128

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

2015, No. 147

(Adj. Sess.), § 16.

§ 675.
Fee prior to termination or reinstatement of suspension or revocation of license.

Before a suspension or revocation issued by the Commissioner of a person’s operator’s license or privilege of operating a motor vehicle may be terminated or before a person’s operator’s license or privilege of operating a motor vehicle may be reinstated, there shall be paid to the Commissioner a fee of $80.00 in addition to any other fee required by statute. This section shall not apply to suspensions issued under the provisions of chapter 11 of this title nor suspensions issued for physical disabilities or failing to pass reexamination. The Commissioner shall not reinstate the license of a driver whose license was suspended pursuant to section 1205 of this title until the Commissioner receives certification from the court that the costs due the State have been paid.

Any suspension issued as a result of improper information received from the criminal justice system shall be canceled and removed from the record without payment of any fee upon receipt of proper information that the suspension should not have been requested.

HISTORY:

Added

1979, No. 202

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, Pt. II, eff. Sept. 1, 1980; amended

1981, No. 180

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. April 22, 1982;

1989, No. 51

, § 40;

1995, No. 77

(Adj. Sess.), § 7, eff. March 21, 1996;

2001, No. 102

(Adj. Sess.), § 25, eff. May 15, 2002;

2005, No. 175

(Adj. Sess.), § 37;

2009, No. 50

, § 49;

2015, No. 159

(Adj. Sess.), § 38.

§ 676.
Operation after suspension, revocation, or refusal — civil violation.

A person whose license or privilege to operate a motor vehicle has been revoked, suspended, or refused by the Commissioner of Motor Vehicles for any reason other than a violation of subsection 1091(b), 1094(b), 1128(b) or (c) of this title, or section 1201 of this title or a suspension under section 1205 of this title and who operates or attempts to operate a motor vehicle upon a public highway before the license or privilege of the person to operate a motor vehicle has been reinstated by the Commissioner commits a civil traffic violation.

In establishing a prima facie case against a person accused of violating this section, the Judicial Bureau shall accept as evidence a printout attested to by the law enforcement officer as the person’s motor vehicle record showing convictions and resulting license suspensions. The admitted motor vehicle record shall establish a permissive inference that the person was under suspension or had his or her license revoked on the dates and time periods set forth in the record. The Judicial Bureau shall not require a certified copy of the person’s motor vehicle record from the Department of Motor Vehicles to establish the permissive inference.

HISTORY:

Added

1991, No. 55

, § 12; amended

1997, No. 117

(Adj. Sess.), § 8a;

1999, No. 110

(Adj. Sess.), § 3;

1999, No. 160

(Adj. Sess.), § 13;

2001, No. 75

(Adj. Sess.), § 6, eff. May 15, 2002;

2003, No. 54

, § 13.

§ 677.
Operating commercial motor vehicle after disqualification.

A person who has been disqualified from holding a commercial driver’s license under subsection 4116(d) of this title and who operates or attempts to operate a commercial motor vehicle upon a public highway before the commercial driver’s license has been reinstated commits a civil traffic violation. A person who has been disqualified from holding a commercial driver’s license under subsection 4116(a), (b), (c), or (e) of this title and who operates or attempts to operate a commercial motor vehicle on a public highway after the disqualification period has expired but prior to reinstatement commits a civil traffic violation.

A person who has been disqualified from holding a commercial driver’s license under subsection 4116(a), (b), (c), or (e) of this title and who operates or attempts to operate a commercial motor vehicle upon a public highway before the disqualification period has expired shall be subject to the penalties set forth in subsection 674(a) of this title.

A person who violates subsection (a) of this section for the third or subsequent time shall be subject to the penalties set forth in subsection 674(a) of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

1991, No. 55

, § 13.

§ 678.
Repealed. 2013, No. 57, § 12.

§ 679.
Operating commercial motor vehicle after privilege suspended.

A person whose privilege to operate a commercial motor vehicle has been suspended under section 4116a of this title and who operates or attempts to operate a commercial motor vehicle upon a public highway before the suspension period has expired shall be subject to the penalties set forth in subsection 674(a) of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

1999, No. 160

(Adj. Sess.), § 24.